California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 compacting state appointed pursuant to the terms of this compact, responsible for the administration and management of the state’s supervision and transfer of juveniles subject to the terms of this compact, the rules adopted by the Interstate Commission, and policies adopted by the State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision under this compact.

(c) “Compacting state” means any state which has enacted the enabling legislation for this compact.

(d) “Commissioner” means the voting representative of each compacting state appointed pursuant to Article III of this compact.

(e) “Court” means any court having jurisdiction over delinquent, neglected, or dependent children.

(f) “Deputy Compact Administrator” means the individual, if any, in each compacting
 state appointed to act on behalf of a Compact Administrator pursuant to the terms of this compact responsible for the administration and management of the state’s supervision and transfer of juveniles subject to the terms of this compact, the rules adopted by the Interstate Commission and policies adopted by the State Council under this compact.

(g) “Interstate Commission” means the Interstate Commission for Juveniles created by Article III of this compact.

(h) “Juvenile” means any person defined as a juvenile in any member state or by the rules of the Interstate Commission, including:

(1) “Accused delinquent” means a person charged with an offense that, if committed by an adult, would be a criminal offense;

(2) “Adjudicated delinquent” means a person
 found to have committed an offense that, if committed by an adult, would be a criminal offense;

(3) “Accused status offender” means a person charged with an offense that would not be a criminal offense if committed by an adult;

(4) “Adjudicated status offender” means a person found to have committed an offense that would not be a criminal offense if committed by an adult; and

(5) “Non-offender” means a person in need of supervision who has not been accused or adjudicated a status offender or delinquent.

(i) “Noncompacting state” means any state which has not enacted the enabling legislation for this compact.

(j) “Probation or parole” means any kind of supervision or conditional release of
 juveniles authorized under the laws of the compacting states.

(k) “Rule” means a written statement by the Interstate Commission promulgated pursuant to Article VI of this compact that is of general applicability, implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of the compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the commission, and has the force and effect of statutory law in a compacting state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule.

(l) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia (or its designee), the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, and the Northern Marianas Islands.

 ARTICLE IIIINTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR JUVENILES

 

(a) The compacting states hereby create the “Interstate Commission for Juveniles.” The commission shall be a body corporate and joint agency of the compacting states. The commission shall have all the responsibilities, powers, and duties set forth herein, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the respective legislatures of the compacting states in accordance with the terms of this compact.

(b) The Interstate Commission shall consist of commissioners appointed by the appropriate appointing authority in each state pursuant to the rules and requirements of each compacting state and in consultation with the State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision created hereunder. The
 commissioner shall be the compact administrator, deputy compact administrator, or designee from that state who shall serve on the Interstate Commission in such capacity under or pursuant to the applicable law of the compacting state.

(c) In addition to the commissioners who are the voting representatives of each state, the Interstate Commission shall include individuals who are not commissioners, but who are members of interested organizations. Such noncommissioner members must include a member of the national organizations of governors, legislators, state chief justices, attorneys general, Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children, juvenile justice and juvenile corrections officials, and crime victims. All noncommissioner members of the Interstate Commission shall be ex officio (nonvoting) members. The Interstate Commission may provide in its bylaws for such additional ex officio
 (nonvoting) members, including members of other national organizations, in such numbers as shall be determined by the commission.

(d) Each compacting state represented at any meeting of the commission is entitled to one vote. A majority of the compacting states shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws of the Interstate Commission.

(e) The commission shall meet at least once each calendar year. The chairperson may call additional meetings and, upon the request of a simple majority of the compacting states, shall call additional meetings. Public notice shall be given of all meetings and meetings shall be open to the public.

(f) The Interstate Commission shall establish an executive committee, which shall include commission officers, members, and others
 as determined by the bylaws. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission during periods when the Interstate Commission is not in session, with the exception of rulemaking or amendment to the compact. The executive committee shall oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact managed by an executive director and Interstate Commission staff, and the committee shall administer enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its bylaws and rules, and perform such other duties as directed by the Interstate Commission or set forth in the bylaws.

(g) Each member of the Interstate Commission shall have the right and power to cast a vote to which that compacting state is entitled and to participate in the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission. A member shall vote in person and shall not delegate a vote to another compacting state. However, a commissioner,
 in consultation with the state council, shall appoint another authorized representative, in the absence of the commissioner from that state, to cast a vote on behalf of the compacting state at a specified meeting. The bylaws may provide for members’ participation in meetings by telephone or other means of telecommunication or electronic communication.

(h) The Interstate Commission’s bylaws shall establish conditions and procedures under which the Interstate Commission shall make its information and official records available to the public for inspection or copying. The Interstate Commission may exempt from disclosure any information or official records to the extent they would adversely affect personal privacy rights or proprietary interests.

(i) Public notice shall be given of all meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public, except as set forth in the rules or as
 otherwise provided in the compact. The Interstate Commission and any of its committees may close a meeting to the public where it determines by two-thirds vote that an open meeting would be likely to:

(1) Relate solely to the Interstate Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures.

(2) Disclose matters specifically exempted from disclosure by statute.

(3) Disclose trade secrets or commercial or financial information which is privileged or confidential.

(4) Involve accusing any person of a crime, or formally censuring any person.

(5) Disclose information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.

(6) Disclose investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes.

(7) Disclose information contained in or related to examination, operating or condition reports prepared by, or on behalf of or for the use of, the Interstate Commission with respect to a regulated person or entity for the purpose of regulation or supervision of such person or entity.

(8) Disclose information, the premature disclosure of which would significantly endanger the stability of a regulated person or entity.

(9) Specifically relate to the Interstate Commission’s issuance of a subpoena, or its participation in a civil action or other legal proceeding.

(j) For every meeting closed pursuant to this provision, the
 Interstate Commission’s legal counsel shall publicly certify that, in the legal counsel’s opinion, the meeting may be closed to the public, and shall reference each relevant exemptive provision. The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes which shall fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in any meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of any actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of each of the views expressed on any item and the record of any roll call vote (reflected in the vote of each member on the question). All documents considered in connection with any action shall be identified in such minutes.

(k) The Interstate Commission shall collect standardized data concerning the interstate movement of juveniles as directed through its rules which shall specify the data to be collected, the means of collection and data exchange and reporting requirements. Such methods of data collection,
 exchange and reporting shall insofar as is reasonably possible conform to up-to-date technology and coordinate its information functions with the appropriate repository of records.

 ARTICLE IVPOWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

 

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) To provide for dispute resolution among compacting states.

(b) To promulgate rules to effect the purposes and obligations as enumerated in this compact, which shall have the force and effect of statutory law and shall be binding in the compacting states to the extent and
 in the manner provided in this compact.

(c) To oversee, supervise, and coordinate the interstate movement of juveniles subject to the terms of this compact and any bylaws adopted and rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission.

(d) To enforce compliance with the compact provisions, the rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary and proper means, including but not limited to the use of judicial process.

(e) To establish and maintain offices which shall be located within one or more of the compacting states.

(f) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.

(g) To borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel.

(h) To establish and appoint committees and hire staff which it deems necessary for the carrying out of its functions including, but not limited to, an executive committee as required by Article III which shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission in carrying out its powers and duties hereunder.

(i) To elect or appoint such officers, attorneys, employees, agents, or consultants, and to fix their compensation, define their duties and determine their qualifications, and to establish the Interstate Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to, inter alia, conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel.

(j) To accept any and all donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of it.

(k) To lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use any property, real, personal, or mixed.

(l) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed.

(m) To establish a budget and make expenditures and levy dues as provided in Article VIII of this compact.

(n) To sue and be sued.

(o) To adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and operation of the Interstate Commission.

(p) To perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact.

(q) To report annually to the legislatures, governors, judiciary, and state councils of the compacting states concerning the activities of the Interstate Commission during the preceding year. Such reports shall also include any recommendations that may have been adopted by the Interstate Commission.

(r) To coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the interstate movement of juveniles for officials involved in such activity.

(s) To establish uniform standards of the reporting, collecting, and exchanging of data.

(t) The Interstate Commission shall maintain its corporate books and records in accordance with the bylaws.

 ARTICLE VORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

 

(a) Section A. Bylaws. The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of the members present and voting, within 12 months after the first Interstate Commission meeting, adopt bylaws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the compact, including, but not limited to:

(1) Establishing the fiscal year of the Interstate Commission.

(2) Establishing an executive committee and such other committees as may be necessary.

(3) Provide for the establishment of committees
 governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the Interstate Commission.

(4) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Interstate Commission, and ensuring reasonable notice of each such meeting.

(5) Establishing the titles and responsibilities of the officers of the Interstate Commission.

(6) Providing a mechanism for concluding the operations of the Interstate Commission and the return of any surplus funds that may exist upon the termination of the compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations.

(7) Providing “start-up” rules for initial administration of the compact.

(8) Establishing standards and
 procedures for compliance and technical assistance in carrying out the compact.(b) Section B. Officers and Staff

(1) The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of the members, elect annually from among its members a chairperson and a vice chairperson, each of whom shall have such authority and duties as may be specified in the bylaws. The chairperson or, in the chairperson’s absence or disability, the vice-chairperson shall preside at all meetings of the Interstate Commission. The officers so elected shall serve without compensation or remuneration from the Interstate Commission; provided that, subject to the availability of budgeted funds, the officers shall be reimbursed for any ordinary and necessary costs and expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties and responsibilities as officers of the Interstate Commission.

(2) The Interstate Commission shall, through its executive committee, appoint or retain an executive director for such period, upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as the Interstate Commission may deem appropriate. The executive director shall serve as secretary to the Interstate Commission, but shall not be a member and shall hire and supervise such other staff as may be authorized by the Interstate Commission.

(c) Section C. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification

(1) The commission’s executive director and employees shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out of or relating to any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
 occurred, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided, that any such person shall not be protected from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of any such person.

(2) The liability of any commissioner, or the employee or agent of a commissioner, acting within the scope of such person’s employment or duties for acts, errors, or omissions occurring within such person’s state may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the United States Constitution and laws of that state for state officials, employees, and agents. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of any such person.

(3) The Interstate Commission shall defend the executive director or the employees or representatives of the Interstate Commission and, subject to the approval of the Attorney General of the state represented by any commissioner of a compacting state, shall defend such commissioner or the commissioner’s representatives or employees in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such person.

(4) The Interstate Commission shall indemnify and hold
 the commissioner of a compacting state, or the commissioner’s representatives or employees, or the Interstate Commission’s representatives or employees, harmless in the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against such persons arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such persons.

 ARTICLE VIRULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

 

(a) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate and publish rules in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the compact.

(b) Rulemaking shall occur pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the bylaws and rules adopted pursuant thereto. Such rulemaking shall substantially conform to the principles of the “Model State Administrative Procedures Act,” 1981 Act, Uniform Laws Annotated, Vol. 15, p.1 (2000), or such other administrative procedures act, as the Interstate Commission deems appropriate consistent with the due process requirements under the United States Constitution as now or hereafter interpreted by the United States Supreme Court. All rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified, as published with the final version of the rule as approved by the commission.

(c) When promulgating a rule, the Interstate Commission shall, at a minimum:

(1) Publish the proposed rule’s entire text stating the reason(s) for that proposed rule.

(2) Allow and invite any and all persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which information shall be added to the record, and be made publicly available.

(3) Provide an opportunity for an informal hearing if petitioned by 10 or more persons.

(4) Promulgate a final rule and its effective date, if appropriate, based on input from state or local officials, or interested parties.

(d) Allow, not later than sixty days after a rule is promulgated, any interested person to file a petition in the
 United States District Court for the District of Columbia or in the Federal District Court where the Interstate Commission’s principal office is located for judicial review of such rule. If the court finds that the Interstate Commission’s action is not supported by substantial evidence in the rulemaking record, the court shall hold the rule unlawful and set it aside. For purposes of this subdivision, evidence is substantial if it would be considered substantial evidence under the Model State Administrative Procedures Act.

(e) If a majority of the Legislatures of the compacting states rejects a rule, those states may, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact, cause that such rule shall have no further force and effect in any compacting state.

(f) The existing rules governing the operation of the Interstate Compact on Juveniles superceded
 by this act shall be null and void 12 months after the first meeting of the Interstate Commission created hereunder.

(g) Upon determination by the Interstate Commission that a state of emergency exists, it may promulgate an emergency rule which shall become effective immediately upon adoption, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided hereunder shall be retroactively applied to said rule as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than 90 days after the effective date of the emergency rule.

 ARTICLE VIIOVERSIGHT, ENFORCEMENT, AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

 

(a) Section A. Oversight

(1) The Interstate Commission shall oversee the administration and operations of the interstate movement of juveniles subject to this compact in the compacting states and shall monitor such activities being administered in noncompacting states which may significantly affect compacting states.

(2) The courts and executive agencies in each compacting state shall enforce this compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall be received by all the judges, public officers, commissions, and departments of the state government as evidence of the authorized statute and administrative rules. All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules. In any judicial or administrative proceeding in a compacting state pertaining to the subject matter of
 this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Interstate Commission, it shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes.

(b) Section B. Dispute Resolution

(1) The compacting states shall report to the Interstate Commission on all issues and activities necessary for the administration of the compact as well as issues and activities pertaining to compliance with the provisions of the compact and its bylaws and rules.

(2) The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a compacting state, to resolve any disputes or other issues which are subject to the compact and which may arise among compacting states and between compacting and noncompacting states. The commission shall
 promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes among the compacting states.

(3) The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact using any or all means set forth in Article XI of this compact.

 ARTICLE VIIIFINANCE

 

(a) The Interstate Commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

(b) The Interstate Commission shall levy on and collect an annual assessment from
 each compacting state to cover the cost of the internal operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the Interstate Commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission, taking into consideration the population of each compacting state and the volume of interstate movement of juveniles in each compacting state and shall promulgate a rule binding upon all compacting states which governs said assessment.

(c) The Interstate Commission shall not incur any obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Interstate Commission pledge the credit of any of the compacting states, except by and with the authority of the compacting state.

(d) The
 Interstate Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Interstate Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Interstate Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Interstate Commission.

 ARTICLE IXTHE STATE COUNCIL

 

Each member state shall create a State Council for Interstate Juvenile Supervision. While each state may determine the membership of its own state council, its membership must include at least
 one representative from the legislative, judicial, and executive branches of government, victims groups, and the compact administrator, deputy compact administrator or designee. Each compacting state retains the right to determine the qualifications of the compact administrator or deputy compact administrator. Each state council will advise and may exercise oversight and advocacy concerning that state’s participation in Interstate Commission activities and other duties as may be determined by that state, including, but not limited to, development of policy concerning operations and procedures of the compact within that state.

 ARTICLE XCOMPACTING STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENT

 

(a) Any
 state, the District of Columbia (or its designee), the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, and the Northern Marianas Islands as defined in Article II of this compact is eligible to become a compacting state.

(b) The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than 35 of the states. The initial effective date shall be the later of July 1, 2004, or upon enactment into law by the 35th jurisdiction. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other compacting state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of nonmember states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states and territories of the United States.

(c) The
 Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the compacting states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the compacting states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the compacting states.

 ARTICLE XIWITHDRAWAL, DEFAULT, TERMINATION, AND JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT

 

(a) Section A. Withdrawal

(1) Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every compacting state; provided that a compacting state may withdraw from the compact by specifically repealing the statute which enacted the compact into
 law.

(2) The effective date of withdrawal is the effective date of the repeal.

(3) The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state. The Interstate Commission shall notify the other compacting states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty days of its receipt thereof.

(4) The withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including any obligations, the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal.

(5) Reinstatement following withdrawal of any compacting state shall occur upon the
 withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the Interstate Commission

(b) Section B. Technical Assistance, Fines, Suspension, Termination, and Default

(1) If the Interstate Commission determines that any compacting state has at any time defaulted in the performance of any of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact, or the bylaws, or duly promulgated rules, the Interstate Commission may impose any or all of the following penalties:

(A) Remedial training and technical assistance as directed by the Interstate Commission.

(B) Alternative dispute resolution.

(C) Fines, fees, and costs in such amounts as are deemed to be reasonable as fixed by
 the Interstate Commission.

(D) Suspension or termination of membership in the compact, which shall be imposed only after all other reasonable means of securing compliance under the bylaws and rules have been exhausted and the Interstate Commission has therefore determined that the offending state is in default. Immediate notice of suspension shall be given by the Interstate Commission to the Governor, the Chief Justice or the Chief Judicial Officer of the state, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and the state council. The grounds for default include, but are not limited to, failure of a compacting state to perform such obligations or responsibilities imposed upon it by this compact, the bylaws, or duly promulgated rules and any other grounds designated in commission bylaws and rules. The Interstate Commission shall immediately notify the defaulting state in writing of the penalty imposed by the Interstate
 Commission and of the default pending a cure of the default. The commission shall stipulate the conditions and the time period within which the defaulting state must cure its default. If the defaulting state fails to cure the default within the time period specified by the commission, the defaulting state shall be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the compacting states and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact shall be terminated from the effective date of termination.

(2) Within 60 days of the effective date of termination of a defaulting state, the commission shall notify the Governor, the Chief Justice or Chief Judicial Officer, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and the state council of such termination.

(3) The defaulting state is responsible for all assessments, obligations,
 and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination including any obligations, the performance of which extends beyond the effective date of termination.

(4) The Interstate Commission shall not bear any costs relating to the defaulting state unless otherwise mutually agreed upon in writing between the Interstate Commission and the defaulting state.

(5) Reinstatement following termination of any compacting state requires both a reenactment of the compact by the defaulting state and the approval of the Interstate Commission pursuant to the rules.

(c) Section C. Judicial Enforcement

The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of the members, initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the
 Interstate Commission, in the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its offices, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact, its duly promulgated rules, and bylaws, against any compacting state in default. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(d) Section D. Dissolution of Compact

(1) The compact dissolves effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the compacting state, which reduces membership in the compact to one compacting state.

(2) Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded and any surplus funds shall be
 distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

 ARTICLE XIISEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

 

(a) The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

(b) The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

 ARTICLE XIIIBINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

 

(a) Section A. Other Laws

(1) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a compacting state that is not inconsistent with this compact.

(2) All compacting states’ laws other than state constitutions and other interstate compacts conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(b) Section B. Binding Effect of the Compact

(1) All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the compacting states.

(2) All agreements between the
 Interstate Commission and the compacting states are binding in accordance with their terms.

(3) Upon the request of a party to a conflict over meaning or interpretation of Interstate Commission actions, and upon a majority vote of the compacting states, the Interstate Commission may issue advisory opinions regarding such meaning or interpretation.

(4) In the event any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any compacting state, the obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction sought to be conferred by such provision upon the Interstate Commission shall be ineffective and such obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction shall remain in the compacting state and shall be exercised by the agency thereof to which such obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction are delegated by law in effect at the time this compact becomes
 effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 268, Sec. 2.   (AB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

The compact administrator shall be the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or his or her designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 54, Sec. 19.   (SB 1461)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

The executive director of the Corrections Standards Authority shall convene an executive steering committee to review and make recommendations regarding the Interstate Compact for Juveniles and whether permanent membership in the compact would be the most effective and prudent means by which California can achieve the purpose set forth in Section 1400 compared to other alternatives. The Corrections Standards Authority shall present the executive steering committee’s final report, including recommendations for legislative action, if necessary, to the appropriate committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2011. The report shall be concise and may be produced and submitted solely in electronic format.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 268, Sec. 2.   (AB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Youth Reinvestment Grant Program [1450. - 1459.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1450. - 1451.]

1450.

(a) There is hereby established the Youth Reinvestment Grant Program within the Board of State and Community Corrections to grant funds pursuant to this chapter, upon an appropriation of funds for the purposes described in this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may use any funds that were appropriated to the board in the Budget Act of 2018, but that have not been allocated as of January 1, 2020, for grants, as prescribed in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1456).

(2) Funds appropriated to the board in the Budget Act of 2019 for purposes of the Youth Reinvestment Fund grant
 program shall be used for grants, as prescribed in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1456).

(3) Funds appropriated to the board in the Budget Act of 2019 for purposes of the Tribal Youth Diversion grant program shall be used for grants, as prescribed in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1452).

(c) Three percent of the funds in the Youth Reinvestment Grant Program shall be used for administrative costs to the board resulting from the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   (AB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1451.

For purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1454), the following definitions apply:

(a) “Board” means the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(b) “High rate” means a rate that exceeds the state average.

(c) “Trauma-informed” means an approach that involves an understanding of adverse childhood experiences and responding to symptoms of chronic interpersonal trauma and traumatic stress across the lifespan of an
 individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 584, Sec. 2.   (AB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Trauma-Informed Diversion Programs for Indian Children [1452. - 1453.]

1452.

For purposes of this article, “Indian child” and “Indian tribe” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 224.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 33.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1453.

(a) The board shall allocate 3 percent of funds for the Youth Reinvestment Grant Program, upon appropriation of funds pursuant to Section 1450, to Indian tribes through an application process for the purpose of implementing diversion programs for Indian children that use trauma-informed, community-based, and health-based interventions.

(b) Funding priority shall be given to diversion programs that address the needs of Indian children who experience the following:

(1) High rates of juvenile arrests.

(2) High rates of suicide.

(3) High rates of
 alcohol and substance abuse.

(4) Average high school graduation rates that are lower than 75 percent.

(c) Indian tribes may apply for funding under this article on a regional efforts basis and receive the aggregate amount of funds that they would have received if awarded as independent jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 33.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Trauma-Informed Diversion Programs for Minors [1454. - 1455.]

1454.

(a) The board shall allocate 94 percent of funds for the Youth Reinvestment Grant Program, upon appropriation of funds pursuant to Section 1450, to local jurisdictions, including a county, city, or city and county, through a competitive grant process for the purpose of implementing trauma-informed diversion programs for minors.

(b) The board shall distribute a grant under this article pursuant to all of the following conditions:

(1) A local jurisdiction shall be awarded no less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and no more than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) (A) A local jurisdiction shall provide at least a